California statutes. Public Utilities Code
101346.

The district shall not acquire any existing system or part thereof whether by purchase, lease, condemnation, or otherwise, nor shall the district dispose of or lease any transit system or part thereof, nor merge, consolidate, or coordinate any transit system or part thereof, or reduce or limit the lines or service of any existing system or of its system, or terminate any lease arrangement or management contract, unless it shall first have made adequate provision for any employees who are or may be displaced. The terms and conditions of such provision shall be a proper subject of collective bargaining.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101347.

Notwithstanding the provisions of the Government Code, employees of the district may authorize and, upon such authorization, the district shall make deductions from wages and salaries of such employees:

(a) Pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement with a duly designated or certified labor organization for the payment of union dues, fees, or assessments. 

(b) For the payment of contributions pursuant to any health and welfare plan or pension or retirement plan.

(c) For any
 purpose for which deductions may be authorized by employees of any private employer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101348.

The obligation of the district to bargain in good faith with a duly designated or certified labor organization and to execute a written collective bargaining agreement with such labor organization covering the wages, hours, and working conditions of the employees represented by such labor organization in an appropriate unit, and to comply with the terms thereof, shall not be limited or restricted by any provision of law. The obligation of the district to bargain collectively shall extend to all subjects of collective bargaining which are or may be proper subjects of collective bargaining with a private employer, including retroactive provisions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. Retirement [101355. - 101359.]

101355.

Subject to Sections 101356 and 101357, the board shall provide for retirement benefits for the officers and employees of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 372, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

101356.

(a) At its discretion, the board shall select one of the following plans to provide retirement benefits to officers and employees of the district: 

(1) By contracting with the retirement system maintained pursuant to the County Employees Retirement Law of 1937 or the Public Employees’ Retirement Law.

(2) By adopting a qualified plan and tax-exempt trust pursuant to Sections 401(a) and 501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, as amended.

(b) The adoption, terms, and conditions of any retirement system covering employees of the district represented by a labor organization shall be pursuant to the collective bargaining agreement between the labor organization and the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 372, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

101357.

(a) The board shall determine and classify the officers and employees who shall be eligible to participate in the retirement system. However, any action by the board shall be subject to the terms and regulations of a retirement system or plan selected by the board pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 101356, and, in the case of employees of the district represented by a labor organization, subject to the collective bargaining agreement between the labor organization and the district.

(b) The district and the labor organization representing the district’s employees
 in a bargaining unit shall be equally represented in the administration of the retirement system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 372, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

101358.

The retirement system provided for by this chapter shall not include the members of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101359.

As to the members of the retirement system provided for by this chapter, the board may provide for their coverage under Title II of the Federal Social Security Act, as amended, and the related provisions of the Federal Insurance Contributions Act, as amended, and the district may perform all acts necessary or convenient to accomplish such coverage.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 11. Miscellaneous Benefits [101365. - 101366.]

101365.

The board shall provide for the coverage of the officers and employees of the district under the workers’ compensation, unemployment compensation disability, and unemployment insurance laws of the State of California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1454.)
-------------------------------------------

101366.

Subject to such regulations and schedule of contributions of premiums as it shall determine, the board shall provide for group health and medical insurance for such officers and employees of the district who are members of the retirement system provided for by Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 101355) of this part and who request coverage under such insurance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 12. Change of Organization [101370. - 101372.]

101370.

As used in this article the terms “change of organization” and “reorganization” shall have the meanings defined in Section 56021 and Section 56073, respectively, of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 300, Sec. 85.   (AB 1430)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

101371.

A change of organization or a reorganization of the district formed and existing under the provisions of this part may be effected in the manner prescribed by the District Reorganization Act of 1965 (Division 1 (commencing with Section 56000) of Title 6 of the Government Code), and the provisions of that act shall govern any and all such changes of organization or reorganizations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101372.

Notwithstanding Section 101371, from and after the completion of the organization of the district on June 29, 1972, any territory lying outside of the boundaries of the district which is contiguous to and annexed to the City of Bakersfield shall be automatically included within the district upon the effective date of its inclusion within the city, subject only to compliance with the requirements of Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 54900), Part 1, Division 2, Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 590.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 14. SACRAMENTO REGIONAL TRANSIT DISTRICT [102000. - 102700.]



  CHAPTER 1. Title of Act and Policy [102000. - 102002.]

102000.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Sacramento Regional Transit District Act.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------

102001.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares:

(a) It is necessary that a transit district be established to operate a single unified public transportation system in the Sacramento region in order to meet the present and future public transportation, and mass and rapid transit, needs of that region. The existing Sacramento Transit Authority, because of its limited legal and financial base, is unable to solve the transit problems of the Sacramento region and provide the needed comprehensive public transportation system. 

(b) It is, therefore,
 necessary to provide a successor corporation to the authority, to wit: a transit district, and to provide for the formation of such transit district appointed by and responsive to the cities and counties in the Sacramento region served by the district so that there will be sufficient governmental authority to solve the existing and future transportation problems of the Sacramento region and provide the needed comprehensive public transportation system. 

(c) Because there is no general law under which such a district could be formed, the adoption of a special act enabling the creation of a special district is required.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 189.)
-------------------------------------------

102002.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the formation of this district shall further the concept of regional rapid transit and transit districts, with the eventual goal of the creation of a network of rapid transit systems throughout the state which would be operated as a single coordinated statewide system to facilitate the expeditious movement of people between the major metropolitan centers of the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 189.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Definitions [102010. - 102028.]

102010.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the provisions of this chapter govern the construction of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------

102011.

“District” means the Sacramento Regional Transit District.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------

102012.

“Transit” means the transportation of passengers and their incidental baggage by any means.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------

102013.

“Transit works” or “transit facilities” means any or all real and personal property, equipment, rights, or interests owned, or to be acquired, or used, by the district for transit service or purposes, including transit operations, maintenance, or administration. “Transit works” or “transit facilities” are public works for the purposes of the Public Contract Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 522, Sec. 1.   (AB 709)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

102014.

“Board of directors”, “board”, and “directors”, means the board of directors of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------

102015.

“City” means, individually, the Cities of Citrus Heights, Davis, Elk Grove, Folsom, Rancho Cordova, Roseville, Sacramento, West Sacramento, and Woodland, and any other city that is annexed to the district as provided in this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 620, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

102016.

“County” means, individually, the Counties of Sacramento and Yolo, and any other county which is annexed, in whole or in part, to the district as provided in this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------

102017.

“Public agency” includes the State of California, and any county, city, district, or other political subdivision or public entity of, or organized under the laws of, this state, or any department, instrumentality, or agency thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------

102018.

“System” means all transit works and transit facilities owned or held, or to be owned or held, or used, by the district for transit purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 522, Sec. 2.   (AB 709)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

102019.

“Revenues” means all rates, fares, tolls, rentals, or other income and revenue actually received or receivable by, or for the account of, the district from the operation of the system, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, interest allowed on any moneys or securities, any profits derived from the sale of any securities, and any consideration in any way derived from any properties owned, operated, or at any time maintained by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------

102020.

“Person” includes any individual, firm, partnership, association, corporation, limited liability company, trust, or business trust, or the receiver, trustee, or conservator for any thereof, but does not include a public agency, as defined in Section 102017.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1010, Sec. 221.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

102021.

“Establish” includes establish, construct, complete, acquire, extend, or reroute. It does not, however, include the maintenance and operation of any existing system acquired by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------

102022.

“Sacramento Area Council of Governments” means that agency or any successor thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 272, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

102023.

“Tax or financial support” includes funds made available pursuant to the “Mills-Alquist-Deddeh Act” (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 99200) of Part 11 of Division 10), which is also known as the Transportation Development Act, or any successor to that act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 272, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

102025.

“Member entity” means a city or county that is within the boundaries of the district as defined in Section 102052.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 335, Sec. 1.   (AB 738)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

102026.

“Participating entity” means a city or county that has entered into an agreement with the district pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 102100.2, but only during the period in which the agreement is in effect. “Participating entities” means all those cities and counties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 92, Sec. 1.   (AB 1924)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

102027.

“Voting entity” means a member entity or a participating entity. “Voting entities” means all member entities and participating entities.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 272, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

102028.

“Transportation planning agency” shall have the meaning provided in Section 99214.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 272, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Creation of District and Annexation [102050. - 102056.]

102050.

The Sacramento Regional Transit District may be formed pursuant to this chapter to carry out the purposes of this part. The district is hereby designated a rapid transit district. The district shall be a public corporation for those purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 522, Sec. 3.   (AB 709)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

102051.

(a) The district may comprise any city within the boundaries of the County of Sacramento, the Cities of Davis, Roseville, West Sacramento, and Woodland, and the following described territory of the Counties of Sacramento and Yolo, to the extent the territory is not included in the above-mentioned cities:

(1) That portion of the territory within the boundaries of the County of Sacramento that is within the urban service area of the County of Sacramento, as adopted and as hereafter amended, and any other portion of the unincorporated territory within the boundaries of the County of Sacramento where the county has declared a need for the district to operate.

(2) The unincorporated territory of the County
 of Yolo that may be included is described as follows:

(A) Beginning at the northeast corner of Sec. 36, T. 9 N., R. 3 E., M.D.B. & M.; thence north 12 mile along the west line of Sec. 30, T. 9 N., R. 4 E., to the west 14 corner of Sec. 30; thence east12 mile to the center of Sec. 30; thence north 18 mile, more or less, to the north line of Swamp Land Survey No. 970, the point being on the centerline of Tule Lake Road; thence northeasterly along the north line of Swamp Land Survey No. 970 to the centerline of the Sacramento River; thence
 easterly and southerly down and along the Sacramento River to the south line of Swamp Land Survey No. 815; thence northwesterly along the south line of Swamp Land Survey No. 815 to its southwest corner; thence northeasterly along the west line of Swamp Land Survey No. 815 to a point where it is intersected by the quarter section line running east and west through Sec. 30, T. 8 N., R. 4 E.; thence west 34 mile, more or less, to the east 14 corner of Sec. 25, T. 8 N., R. 3 E.; thence north 512 miles, more or less, to the point of beginning.

(B) Beginning at the intersection of State Highway Route 113 and the Yolo County line southern boundary;
 thence easterly along the Yolo County line southern boundary to the Davis City Limits; thence meandering along the Davis City Limits to Russell Boulevard; thence westerly along Russell Boulevard to Route 113; thence southerly along Route 113 to the point of beginning.

(b) For purposes of this section, any reference to an avenue, boulevard, highway, railroad, road, or street includes the right-of-way thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 92, Sec. 2.   (AB 1924)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

102052.

The district shall be formed upon the adoption of a resolution by the City Council of the City of Sacramento and the adoption of a resolution by the Board of Supervisors of the County of Sacramento declaring there is a need for the district to function.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 189.)
-------------------------------------------

102052.5.

(a) The boundaries of the district shall include all of the following:

(1) The City of Sacramento.

(2) The City of Rancho Cordova.

(3) The unincorporated territory of the County of Sacramento that is within the urban service area, as determined by the Board of Supervisors, and not otherwise divided from the rest of the unincorporated territory that is within the urban service area by an incorporated city not previously described in this subdivision.

(4) A city or county authorized to join the district pursuant to Section 102051 that has annexed to the district pursuant to
 the process specified in Section 102055.

(5) A city incorporated on or after January 1, 2016, which city consists entirely of territory that was included in the district before the city’s incorporation.

(b) (1) The boundaries of the district shall not be affected by the incorporation of any territory wholly or partly within the boundaries of the district or by reason of annexation to or detachment from any city or territory wholly or partly within the boundaries of the district, except as provided in this section.

(2) Where territory outside the district is annexed to any city included in the district, that territory shall, upon the completion of the annexation proceeding, be deemed incorporated into and annexed to the district.

(3) Where territory is incorporated as a new city, on or after January 1, 2016, and is partly within and partly outside the district, the entire territory shall, upon completion of the incorporation proceeding, be deemed incorporated into and annexed to the district.

(4) Where territory that is within the boundaries of the district is annexed to any city that is not a member entity, that territory shall remain part of the district unless, at the time of annexation, both of the following apply:

(A) No transit service is operated by the district within the annexed territory or within one-half mile of any outside boundary of the annexed territory.

(B) No transit service is planned by the district, as evidenced by the district’s adopted short-range transit plan, for the annexed territory or within one-half
 mile of any outside boundary of the annexed territory within five years of the annexation, in which case that territory may be detached from the district if the Sacramento County Local Agency Formation Commission determines, during the annexation proceedings, that the area would be better served by the annexing city than the district. The detachment may be accomplished without proceeding with the detachment process in Section 102056.

(c) Whenever territory is deemed incorporated into and annexed to the district pursuant to this section, that territory shall be subject to taxation, in accordance with the assessable valuation of the property in that territory for general district purposes and for payment of any indebtedness previously or thereafter incurred by the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 92, Sec. 3.   (AB 1924)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

102053.

The district may operate and exercise the powers under this part within any city, provided that the district shall have no power to levy an ad valorem property tax within the boundaries of any city that is not within the boundaries of the district as defined in Section 102052.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 335, Sec. 4.   (AB 738)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

102054.

The district may operate and exercise the powers under this part within all or a part of the unincorporated area of any county, provided that the district shall have no power to levy an ad valorem property tax within the unincorporated area that is not within the boundaries of the district as defined in Section 102052.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 335, Sec. 5.   (AB 738)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

102055.

(a) Any city or county authorized to join the district pursuant to Section 102051 may be annexed to the district in the manner provided in this section.

(b) Annexation shall only be effective if the legislative body of the city or county that requests to be annexed to the district agrees in writing with the board of directors upon the terms and conditions of annexation, which agreement, among other things, may provide for any of the following:

(1) The levy and collection of special taxes within the city or unincorporated area of the county in addition to the taxes otherwise provided for in this part.

(2) The fixing of rates, rentals, and
 charges differing from those fixed or existing elsewhere within the district.

(3) The incurring or assumption of indebtedness.

(4) The making of a payment or payments.

(5) The transfer of property, real and personal, and other assets to the district by the city or county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 92, Sec. 4.   (AB 1924)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

102056.

(a) Territory within the district may be detached from the district by a supermajority vote of the board of directors, which shall be at least 67 percent of the nonweighted vote of the existing board, and by a majority vote of the governing body of the territory proposed to be detached, provided that the detached territory shall not be relieved from liability for taxation for the payment of any bonded indebtedness existing at the time of detachment, and provided that all other pending legal and financial obligations have been resolved by mutual agreement.

(b) The detachment
 of territory from the district shall become effective upon giving of the notice required in Section 57204 of the Government Code.

(c) Notice of the detachment of territory from the district shall be given to each assessor whose roll is used for a tax levy made pursuant to this part and to the State Board of Equalization pursuant to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 54900) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 94, Sec. 1.   (AB 631)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Government of District [102100.1. - 102180.]



  ARTICLE 1. Board of Directors [102100.1. - 102107.]

102100.1.

(a) Except as otherwise provided, the government of the district shall be vested in a board of directors. The number of members on the board shall be not less than the number of voting entities.

(b) Each appointee to the board shall serve a four-year term, unless earlier removed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 272, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

102100.2.

(a) The board of directors shall consist of members as follows:

(1) The City Council of the City of Sacramento may appoint three members to the board.

(2) The Board of Supervisors for the County of Sacramento may appoint three members to the board.

(3) For as long as the City of Elk Grove is annexed into the district, the City of Elk Grove may appoint two members to the board.

(4) A member entity that is not identified in paragraph (1), (2), or (3) may appoint one member to the board.

(b) A city or county that is not annexed to the district may become a participating entity that may appoint at least one member to the board if the participating entity enters into an agreement with the district that provides for all of the following:

(1) The participating entity agrees to pay its proportionate share of the district’s cost to provide rail or other districtwide transit services.

(2) The district agrees to maintain a specified level of rail or other districtwide transit services.

(3) The district is not obligated to provide transit services to any particular location or along any particular route.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 92, Sec. 6.   (AB 1924)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

102100.4.

The appointing authority of a participating entity under subdivision (b) of Section 102100.2, and the term of its appointee to the board, shall terminate upon termination or cancellation of the agreement provided for in subdivision (b) of Section 102100.2, and that agreement shall automatically terminate upon the effective date of the entity’s annexation to the district pursuant to Section 102051 or 102055.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 92, Sec. 8.   (AB 1924)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

102100.5.

Each voting entity shall have the right to appoint fewer members than it is entitled to appoint under Section 102100.2, except that each voting entity shall appoint at least one member. Each voting entity shall determine, effective July 1 of each year, how many members it will appoint for the upcoming fiscal year. The legislative body of each voting entity shall provide written notification to the secretary of the board not more than 60 days and not less than 15 days before July 1 of the number of appointments it will make for the upcoming fiscal year beginning July 1. Unless and until that notification is provided, the number of appointments made during the prior year shall govern.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 92, Sec. 9.   (AB 1924)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

102100.6.

An action by the board shall not be void or voidable if it is determined, subsequent to an action in which a member representing a participating entity casts a vote, that the agreement for that participating entity did not comply with subdivision (b) of Section 102100.2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 92, Sec. 10.   (AB 1924)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

102100.7.

The appointments to the board may be changed in the following manner:

Not more often than every two years, the voting entities may, by agreement, apportion the appointments to the board among them in the approximate ratio that the district provides transit service, as determined by the gross cost of the service without regard to income or revenues of the district, within their respective boundaries.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 272, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

102100.10.

Each voting entity appointing members to the board in accordance with Section 102100.2 may also select, in the same manner as the primary member or members, one or more alternates, as the case may be, to serve on the board when the primary member or members are not available. Each alternate shall be appointed to serve for a specific member. The alternate shall be subject to the same restrictions and shall have the same powers, when serving on the board, as the primary member. The legislative body of any voting entity appointing an alternate shall provide written notification to the secretary of the board of each appointment of an alternate in order for the appointment to be effective.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 92, Sec. 11.   (AB 1924)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

102101.

A member of a city council or board of supervisors may serve as a member of the board of directors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------

102104.

The board at its first meeting, and thereafter annually at the first meeting in January, shall elect a chairman who shall preside at all meetings. In the event of his absence or inability to act, the members present, by an order entered in the minutes, shall select one of their members to act as chairman pro tem, who, while so acting, shall have all of the authority of the chairman.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------

102105.

The board shall establish rules for its proceedings. The acts of the board shall be expressed by motion, resolution, or ordinance. All meetings of the board shall be conducted in the manner prescribed by the Ralph M. Brown Act (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 272, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

102105.2.

(a) Each board member shall have one vote.

(b) A majority of the members of the board shall constitute a quorum.

(c) All official acts of the board shall require the affirmative vote of a majority of all the members of the board, unless a higher threshold is required by law.

(d) The board shall post the voting procedure described in this section on the district’s internet website.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 182, Sec. 3.   (AB 2015)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

102106.

Each member of the board shall receive the sum of one hundred dollars ($100) for each attendance at up to four noticed meetings of the board per month, and shall be allowed actual necessary traveling expenses incurred in the discharge of the member’s duties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 272, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

102107.

(a) No ordinance shall be passed by the board on the day of its introduction, nor within three days thereafter, nor at any time other than at a regular or adjourned regular meeting. The enacting clause of all ordinances shall be as follows:

“The board of directors of the Sacramento Regional Transit District do ordain as follows:”

(b) All ordinances shall be signed by the chairman of the board or the chairman pro tempore and attested by the secretary. Before the expiration of 15 days after the passage of an ordinance, it shall be published once in a newspaper of general circulation in the district or on the district’s Internet Web site. An order entered in the minutes of the board
 that the ordinance has been duly published is prima facie proof of such publication.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 522, Sec. 6.   (AB 709)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Powers and Duties of Board of Directors [102120. - 102122.]

102120.

The board of directors is the legislative body of the district and shall determine all questions of district policy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------

102121.

It shall be the duty of the board of directors and it shall have the power to:

(a) Determine the transit facilities to be acquired and constructed by the district, the manner of operation, and the means to finance them.

(b) Adopt an annual budget for the district and fix the compensation of its officers and employees. The board may provide in the budget for a reasonable replacement reserve.

(c) Fix rates, rentals, charges, and classifications of transit service operated by the
 district.

(d) Adopt an administrative code which shall prescribe the powers and duties of district officers, the method of appointment of district employees, and methods, procedures, and systems of operation and management of the district.

(e) Adopt rules and regulations governing the use of transit facilities owned or operated by the district.

(f) Cause a postaudit of the financial transactions and records of the district to be made at least annually by a certified public accountant.

(g) Do any and all things necessary to carry out the purposes of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------

102122.

(a) The board of directors may adopt ordinances that do any of the following:

(1) Prohibit persons from knowingly giving false identification to a district employee engaged in the enforcement of district ordinances or state law, or otherwise obstructing the issuance of a citation for violation of district ordinances or state law.

(2) Prohibit unauthorized operation of, interference with, entry into, climbing upon, attaching to, or loitering on or in, transit facilities or other transit property.

(3) Prohibit the removal, displacement, injury, destruction, or obstruction of any part of any track, switch, turnout, bridge, culvert, or any other district structure or fixture.

(4) Specify conditions under which a passenger may board a district vehicle with a bicycle and where the bicycle may be stowed.

(b) The board may provide that a violation of any ordinance adopted pursuant to subdivision (a) is an infraction punishable by a fine not exceeding seventy-five dollars ($75), and that a violation by a person after the second conviction is punishable by a fine not to exceed two hundred
 fifty dollars ($250) and by community service for a total time not to exceed 48 hours over a period not to exceed 30 days which do not conflict with the violator’s hours of school attendance or employment.

(c) This section does not prohibit any person from engaging in activities that are protected under the laws of the United States or of California, including, but not limited to, picketing, demonstrating, or distributing handbills.

(d) A district employee may enforce any ordinance that is adopted pursuant to this section as provided in subdivision (e) of Section 830.14 of the Penal Code.

(e) Nothing in this section shall affect any rights or immunities conferred pursuant to Section 836.5 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 528, Sec. 4) by Stats. 2011, Ch. 534, Sec. 5.   (AB 716)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Advisory Commission [102140. - 102142.]

102140.

The board may establish an advisory commission to the board pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------

102141.

The commission shall be composed of three persons appointed by the legislative body of each voting entity. At least one of the three persons appointed by each voting entity shall be a sitting member of the voting entity’s legislative body. Persons appointed to the commission shall serve at the pleasure of their appointing body.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 272, Sec. 29.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

102142.

The commission shall meet as often as the board deems necessary, but at least twice annually, and shall advise the board on matters of district policy, including the administrative, fiscal, and operational policies of the district and their relation to the administrative, fiscal, and operational policies of the cities and counties in which the district is operating, levels of service, and allocation of the districts financial resources. The commission shall have such other advisory duties as may be provided by the board pursuant to this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Officers [102160. - 102162.]

102160.

The officers of the district shall consist of the members of the board, and the chair, chair pro tem, and secretary, who shall be selected from the members of the board, except that the secretary may alternatively be an employee of the district appointed by the board. The board may also hire and appoint a general manager, a legal counsel, a controller, a treasurer, and such other officers, assistants, and deputies as the board may deem necessary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 522, Sec. 7.   (AB 709)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

102161.

At any time, any city, county, or other public agency may contract with the district for the performance of services on behalf of the district by the legal counsel, controller or fiscal officer, or treasurer of the city, county, or public agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 536, Sec. 5.   (AB 957)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

102162.

Article 4 (commencing with Section 1090) and Article 4.6 (commencing with Section 1120), Chapter 1, Division 4, Title 1 of the Government Code shall apply to all officers, employees, and contracts of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. General Manager [102180. - 102180.]

102180.

The power and duties of the general manager are:

(a) To head the administrative branch of the district and to be responsible to the board for the proper administration of all affairs of the district.

(b) To appoint, supervise, suspend, or remove district employees other than members of the board and officers appointed by the board.

(c) To supervise and direct the preparation of the annual budget for the board and be responsible for its administration after its adoption.

(d) To formulate and present to the board plans for transit facilities within the district and the means to finance them.

(e) To supervise the planning, acquisition, construction, maintenance, and operation of the transit facilities of the district.

(f) To attend all meetings of the board and act as the secretary to the board. 

(g) To prepare and submit to the board, as soon as practicable after the end of each fiscal year, a complete report of the finances and administrative activities of the district for the preceding year.

(h) To perform such other and additional duties as the board may require.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 189.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Powers and Functions of District [102200. - 102355.]



  ARTICLE 1. Corporate Power [102200. - 102205.]

102200.

The district has perpetual succession and may adopt a seal and alter it at its pleasure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------

102201.
